North Dakota statutes. TITLE 18 Fires
CHAPTER 18-12 Fire Prevention Code for School Buildings

18-12-01.
Application.

The provisions of this chapter apply to the construction of all new school buildings, additions thereto, and remodeling of school buildings, both public and private, at either the elementary or secondary level and further apply to all instructional areas of all institutions of higher education.

Source:

S.L. 1961, ch. 179, § 1.

18-12-02.
Definitions.

A public school building is defined as a building used wholly or in part as an instructional or recreational facility by students. A private school is defined as an educational institution which students attend in lieu of public school attendance.

Source:

S.L. 1961, ch. 179, § 2.

18-12-03.
Plans and specifications.

Plans and specifications for all new public school buildings and for all additions to and remodeling of existing public school buildings must be submitted for approval to the state fire marshal, chief of the fire department or fire protection district with jurisdiction, and the superintendent of public instruction or state board of higher education. Private school plans and specifications must be submitted directly to the state fire marshal and the chief of the fire department or fire protection district with jurisdiction for approval.

Source:

S.L. 1961, ch. 179, § 3; 2017, ch. 159, § 4, effective August 1, 2017.

18-12-04.
Employment of registered architects and engineers.

All plans and specifications for construction, except agricultural sheds and barns, the monetary worth of which is one hundred thousand dollars or more, must be prepared by and the construction administration and construction observation services supervised by architects or engineers registered in this state. The architect or engineer is legally responsible for designing the building in accordance with the provisions of this chapter of adequate strength so as to resist fire, and constructing the building in a workmanlike manner, according to the plans and specifications as approved. School district projects are subject to the approval requirements of section 15.1-36-01 and projects involving institutions of higher education under the control of the state board of higher education are subject to the approval requirements of chapter 15-10.

Source:

S.L. 1961, ch. 179, § 4; 1975, ch. 193, § 1; 1997, ch. 353, § 1; 2011, ch. 151, § 3.

Effective Date.

The 2011 amendment of this section by section 3 of chapter 151, S.L. 2011 became effective July 1, 2011, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 5 of chapter 151, S.L. 2011.

18-12-05.
State fire marshal.

The state fire marshal and the chief of the fire department or fire protection district shall approve plans and specifications for school buildings before construction is started. It is the duty of the person that prepared the plans or the person that is supervising the construction to notify the state fire marshal and the chief of the fire department or fire protection district when the building has been completed.

Source:

S.L. 1961, ch. 179, § 5; 2017, ch. 159, § 5, effective August 1, 2017.

18-12-06.
Construction requirements.

The construction requirements for schools are those contained within the state building code as defined in section 54-21.3-03.

Source:

S.L. 1961, ch. 179, § 6; 1963, ch. 188, § 1; 1985, ch. 257, § 1.

18-12-07.
Shops and industrial arts. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1985, ch. 257, § 4.

18-12-08.
Auditorium stage area protection. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1985, ch. 257, § 4.

18-12-09.
Corridors. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1985, ch. 257, § 4.

18-12-10.
Exits. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1985, ch. 257, § 4.

18-12-11.
Stairways. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1985, ch. 257, § 4.

18-12-12.
Interior finish. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1985, ch. 257, § 4.

18-12-13.
Fire extinguishers. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1985, ch. 257, § 4.

18-12-14.
Storage rooms — Ordinary combustibles. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1985, ch. 257, § 4.

18-12-15.
Storage rooms — Flammable liquids and dangerous chemicals. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1985, ch. 257, § 4.

18-12-16.
Fire alarm systems.

Fire alarm systems for school buildings must be installed in accordance with the rules set forth in North Dakota Administrative Code chapter 10-07-01.

Source:

S.L. 1961, ch. 179, § 16; 2019, ch. 182, § 6, effective August 1, 2019.

18-12-17.
Sprinklers. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1985, ch. 257, § 4.

18-12-18.
Heating plant rooms. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1985, ch. 257, § 4.

18-12-19.
Incinerators. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1985, ch. 257, § 4.

18-12-20.
Ventilation. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1985, ch. 257, § 4.

18-12-21.
Hot water. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1985, ch. 257, § 4.

18-12-22.
Gas.

A master valve must be provided in each room where there are three or more gas outlets. This valve must be conveniently located and easily distinguishable so that it may be readily closed when the room is not in use. If a room is not in use, the administrator’s desk and the laboratory proper should be kept under lock and key.

A shutoff valve must be provided outside the building.

All gas heaters must be vented unless approved by the state fire marshal.

All liquefied petroleum gas, or bottled gas, installations must be in accordance with the state regulations for such use. When such gas supply lines are placed in tunnels, they must be without joints and the tunnels must have forced ventilation, except when the length of the line does not exceed the width of the tunnel ventilation does not have to be provided.

Source:

S.L. 1961, ch. 179, § 22.

18-12-23.
Electrical.

All electrical wiring and apparatus must be installed in accordance with the provisions of the state electrical law, rules, and regulations and local ordinances and the current edition of the National Electrical Code.

Electrical plans and specifications must be reviewed by the state electrical board upon referral by the superintendent of public instruction, the state board of higher education, and the state fire marshal, and complete inspection service with final certificate of compliance covering the electrical installation must be made by the same agency or by the local inspection authority where available.

All educational facilities must be provided with exit marking, illumination of means of egress, and emergency lighting as provided for within the N.F.P.A. Life Safety Code, standard 101 edition, corresponding to that of the state building code as defined in section 54-21.3-03.

Source:

S.L. 1961, ch. 179, § 23; 1985, ch. 257, § 2.

18-12-24.
Change of occupancy.

When an approved designated occupancy is changed during planning or construction to another occupancy, all of the fire protection requirements for the new occupancy must be complied with.

Source:

S.L. 1961, ch. 179, § 24.

18-12-25.
Reference data.

The following data must be used as reference and as an aid in the interpretation of this chapter:

State and local fire and building codes.

The National Electrical Code - national fire protection association.

The International Fire Code.

The national fire protection association.

Source:

S.L. 1961, ch. 179, § 25; 1985, ch. 257, § 3; 1989, ch. 263, § 1; 2001, ch. 484, § 1; 2017, ch. 159, § 6, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 182, § 7, effective August 1, 2019.